Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.030

Homestead exemption amount.

(1) The homestead exemption amount is the greater of:

(a) $125,000;

(b) The county median sale price of a single-family home in the preceding calendar year; or

(c) Where the homestead is subject to execution, attachment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever to satisfy a judgment in favor of any state for failure to pay that state's income tax on benefits received while a resident of the state of Washington from a pension or other retirement plan, no dollar limit.

(2) In determining the county median sale price of a single-family home in the preceding year, a court shall use data from the Washington center for real estate research or, if the Washington center no longer provides the data, a successor entity designated by the office of financial management.

[ 2021 c 290 s 3; 2007 c 429 s 1; 1999 c 403 s 4; 1993 c 200 s 2; 1991 c 123 s 2; 1987 c 442 s 203; 1983 1st ex.s. c 45 s 4; 1981 c 329 s 10; 1977 ex.s. c 98 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 12 s 1; 1955 c 29 s 1; 1945 c 196 s 3; 1895 c 64 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 552. Formerly RCW 6.12.050.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2021 c 290: See notes following RCW 6.13.010.

Purpose—1991 c 123: "The legislature recognizes that retired persons generally are financially dependent on fixed pension or retirement benefits and passive income from investment property. Because of this dependency, retired persons are more vulnerable than others to inflation and depletion of their assets. It is the purpose of this act to increase the protection of income of retired persons residing in the state of Washington from collection of income taxes imposed by other states." [ 1991 c 123 s 1.]

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 12: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 12 s 5.]